Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-617.03
Delayed birth certificate; contents.

Any birth certificate filed one year or more after the date of birth shall be marked Delayed and shall show on the face of the certificate the date of the delayed registration. A summary statement of the evidence submitted in support of the delayed registration shall be listed on the certificate.

Laws 1985, LB 42, § 10.